Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 10

Commission on Intergovernmental Relations

4-10-101. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that there is a need for a permanent intergovernmental body to study and report on:

The current pattern of local governmental structure and its viability;

The powers and functions of local governments, including their fiscal powers;

The existing, necessary and desirable relationships between and among local governments and the state;

The existing, necessary and desirable allocation of state and local fiscal resources;

The existing, necessary and desirable roles of the state as the creator of the local governmental systems;

The special problems in interstate areas facing their general local governments, intrastate regional units, and areawide bodies, such studies where possible to be conducted in conjunction with those of a pertinent sister state commission; and

Any constitutional amendments and statutory enactments required to implement appropriate commission recommendations.

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1001.

Cross-References. Office of local government, title 4, ch. 16.

4-10-102. Advisory commission on intergovernmental relations — Creation.

There is hereby created the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations.

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-1002.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

4-10-103. Members — Appointment — Officers — Terms — Quorum.

Beginning July 1, 1997, the commission shall be composed of the following twenty-five (25) members; provided, that the membership may exceed this number until the appropriate terms of office have expired as provided in this section:

The chair of the senate finance, ways and means committee;

The chair of the finance ways and means committee of the house of representatives;

Four (4) state senators appointed by the speaker of the senate;

Four (4) state representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

Four (4) elected municipal officials;

Four (4) elected county officials;

Two (2) executive branch members, one (1) of whom may be the commissioner of finance and administration, each appointed by the governor;

Two (2) private citizens, each appointed by the governor;

One (1) elected representative of the Tennessee Development District Association;

One (1) elected representative of the County Officials Association of Tennessee, appointed by the governor; and

The comptroller of the treasury.

Members currently holding appointments on the commission shall serve their full terms. As vacancies occur, new appointments shall be filled by the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives by alternating appointments until each speaker has made three (3) non-legislative appointments for a maximum of seven (7) appointments. Thereafter, appointments shall alternate among the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, respectively; provided, that none of the appointing authorities mentioned in this subsection (b) shall exceed the number of appointments as provided in this subsection (b). The next three (3) vacancies in the category of private citizen shall not be filled, thereby reducing the total number of private citizens serving on the commission to two (2). Total membership may exceed twenty-five (25) members until the necessary vacancies occur in the private citizen category.

The chair and vice chair of the commission shall be elected by the members of the commission for two-year terms and may subsequently be reelected; provided, that the chair shall be a member of the general assembly. In the event of the absence or disability of both the chair and vice chair, the members of the commission shall elect a temporary chair by a majority vote of those present and voting.

Members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years and may be subsequently appointed to additional four-year terms except in those instances where membership is reduced as provided in this section. In the case of members of the general assembly, appointments and reappointments shall be consistent with terms of office for the senate and the house of representatives. Members currently holding office are eligible for reappointment for one (1) additional term; provided, that those holding positions subject to downsizing shall not be eligible for reappointment.

Should any member cease to be an officer, member or employee of the unit, body or agency such member is appointed to represent, such member's membership on the commission shall terminate immediately and a new member shall be appointed for a full term in the same manner as such new member's predecessor.

The members appointed from private life under subsection (a) shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation. Such members shall not hold any public office.

Of each class of local government members appointed, no more than one-half (½) shall be from any one (1) political party.

Of each class of legislative members appointed by the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, two (2) shall be from the majority party of their respective houses.

A majority of those currently appointed to the commission shall constitute a quorum.

For each municipal vacancy, the Tennessee Municipal League shall submit a list of three (3) elected nominees to the appropriate appointing authority.

For each general county government vacancy, the Tennessee County Services Association shall submit a list of three (3) elected nominees to the appropriate appointing authority.

For the development district vacancy, the Tennessee Development District Association shall submit a list of three (3) elected nominees to the appropriate appointing authority; except as provided in subdivision (d)(1).

For the county officials vacancy, the County Officials Association of Tennessee shall submit a list of three (3) elected nominees to the governor.

In implementing this section, the state shall aggressively seek racial and gender diversity by enlisting ethnic minority and female participation on all levels. No person shall be excluded from participation in, or be denied the benefits of, any program or activity receiving funding as a result of implementation of this section on grounds of race, color or gender.

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-1003; Acts 1980, ch. 873, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 118, § 1; 1982, ch. 688, §§ 1-4; 1984, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 264, §§ 1-4; 1988, ch. 1013, § 3; 1989, ch. 368, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 840, §§ 1-4; 1997, ch. 482, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 529, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

In addition to the insertion of “for a full term” in (d)(2), Acts 1997, ch. 529 also purported, in § 1, to substitute “the Tennessee County Services Association and the Tennessee Municipal League, respectively” for “their respective state associations” in (a)(1). However, the affected language no longer appeared in this section, due to a prior amendment by Acts 1997, ch. 482, and so the amendment by Acts 1997, ch. 529, § 1 is deemed to be of no effect.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 482, which rewrote this section, provided in § 3 that in implementing the provisions of this act, the state shall aggressively seek racial and gender diversity by enlisting ethnic minority and female participation on all levels. No person shall be excluded from participation in, or be denied the benefits of any program or activity receiving funding as a result of implementation of this section on grounds of race, color or gender.

4-10-104. Duties.

The commission shall:

Serve as a forum for the discussion and resolution of intergovernmental problems;

Engage in such activities and make such studies and investigations as are necessary or desirable in the accomplishment of the purposes set forth in § 4-10-101;

Consider, on its own initiative, ways and means of fostering better relations among local governments and state government;

Draft and disseminate legislative bills, constitutional amendments and model local ordinances necessary to implement recommendations of the commission;

Encourage, and where appropriate, coordinate studies relating to intergovernmental relations conducted by universities, state, local and federal agencies, and research and consulting organizations;

Review the recommendations of national commissions studying federal, state and local government relationships and problems and assess their possible application to this state;

Study issues relating to changing federalism, including federal devolution, block grants, preemptions, mandates, and the tenth amendment to the Constitution of the United States;

Study tax equivalent payments by municipally owned electric operations to the various taxing jurisdictions within the state;

Study the laws relating to the assessment and taxation of property;

Conduct an annual study of the fiscal capacity of local governments to fund education; and

Conduct an annual infrastructure study.

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-1004; Acts 1980, ch. 873, § 4; 1987, ch. 264, § 5; 1996, ch. 840, § 5; 1997, ch. 529, §§ 3-5.

4-10-105. Meetings — Committees — Rules of procedure.

The commission shall hold meetings quarterly and at such other times as it deems necessary. The commission may hold public hearings from time to time on matters within its purview.

Each officer, board, commission, council, department or agency of state government, and each political subdivision of the state, shall make available all facts, records, information and data requested by the commission, and in all ways cooperate with the commission, in carrying out the functions and duties imposed by this chapter.

The commission may establish committees as it deems advisable and feasible, whose membership shall include at least one (1) member of the commission, but only the commission itself may set policy or take other official action.

The commission shall promulgate rules of procedure governing its operations; provided, that they are in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

All meetings of the commission, or any committee thereof, at which public business is discussed or formal action is taken shall conform to title 8, chapter 44.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the commission.

Subdivision (f)(1)(A) shall not apply to members appointed under § 4-10-103(a)(1), (2), and (11), or the commissioner of finance and administration if appointed under § 4-10-103(a)(7).

The executive director of the commission shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (f)(1)(A).

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 5; T.C.A., § 4-1005; Acts 2017, ch. 116, § 3.

Cross-References. Public meetings, title 8, ch. 44.

4-10-106. Staff assistance.

In addition to its own staff, and at the request of the chair, the comptroller of the treasury and the institute of public service of the University of Tennessee are authorized to provide staff assistance as necessary.

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-1006; Acts 1980, ch. 873, § 5; 1996, ch. 840, § 6.

4-10-107. Compensation — Appropriations.

No member of the commission is entitled to a salary for duties performed as a member of the commission.

Members who are not government employees or officers shall receive seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per diem for attendance at meetings of the commission.

Each member is entitled to reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties in accordance with the state comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The commission is authorized to apply for, contract for, receive and expend for its purposes any appropriations or grants from the state, its political subdivisions, the federal government, or any other source, public or private.

Political subdivisions of the state are authorized to appropriate funds to the commission to share in the cost of its operations, and may furnish staff personnel to the commission.

In addition to any funds appropriated by the general assembly to the commission, the commission is authorized to receive annual allocations of funds from the Tennessee State Revenue Sharing Act, § 67-9-102(b)(3).

Funds provided under §§ 4-10-109 and 67-9-102 to the commission shall not revert to the general fund at the conclusion of a fiscal year, but such funds shall be carried forward. Other funds available to the commission funds may revert to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year subject to the approval of the chair of the commission.

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-1007; Acts 1996, ch. 817, § 2; 1997, ch. 528, § 1; 1997, ch. 529, §§ 6, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 528, § 2 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to (e) shall be made in violation of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

4-10-108. Reports.

The commission shall issue reports of its findings and recommendations, as appropriate, and shall issue a biennial report on its work. Copies of the biennial report shall be distributed to members of the commission, the library and archives and the legislative library. Upon request, copies shall be provided to other public officials, public agencies, and to the public. Copies of reports mandated by the general assembly shall be distributed to all legislative members.

Acts 1978, ch. 939, § 8; T.C.A., § 4-1008; Acts 1990, ch. 695, § 1; 1990, ch. 1024, § 8; 1996, ch. 840, § 7.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-10-109. Inventory of public infrastructure needs.

The commission shall annually compile and maintain an inventory of needed infrastructure within this state. The information and data gathered by such an annual inventory is deemed necessary in order for the state, municipal and county governments of Tennessee to develop goals, strategies and programs that would improve the quality of life of its citizens, support livable communities and enhance and encourage the overall economic development of the state through the provision of adequate and essential public infrastructure. All funds necessary and required for this inventory shall be administered through the commission's annual budget, and such funds shall be in addition to the commission's annual operational budget amounts. The inventory shall include, at a minimum, needed public infrastructure facilities that would enhance and encourage economic development, improve the quality of life of the citizens and support livable communities within each municipality, utility district, county and development district region of the state, and shall include needs for transportation, water and wastewater, industrial sites, municipal solid waste, recreation, low and moderate income housing, telecommunications, other infrastructure needs such as public buildings, including city halls, courthouses and kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) educational facilities, and other public facilities needs as deemed necessary by the commission. The data shall be compiled on a county-by-county basis within each development district area. The commission shall annually contract for the services of the state's nine (9) development districts to accomplish this inventory. However, if the executive director finds that a development district has not adequately fulfilled a prior inventory contract, then instead of the development district that has not fulfilled its contract obligations, the executive director may annually contract with another agency or entity of state or local government or higher education to perform the inventory within that district's area.

In compiling the public infrastructure needs inventory on a county-by-county basis, at a minimum, the commission shall consult with each county mayor, mayor, local planning commission, utility district, county road superintendent and other appropriate local and state officials concerning planned or anticipated, or both, public infrastructure needs over the next five-year period, together with estimated costs and time of need within that time frame. From those cities and counties with adopted growth plans in accordance with title 6, chapter 58, the commission shall gather and report the infrastructure, urban services' and public facilities' needs reported in the growth plans. These infrastructure needs are factors in the determination of urban growth boundaries for cities and the planned growth areas for counties. Implementation of infrastructure, urban services and public facility elements of the city and county growth plans are to be monitored by means of the five-year inventory of public infrastructure needs.

The public infrastructure needs inventory shall not include projects considered to be normal or routine maintenance. Moreover, infrastructure needs projects included in the inventory should involve a capital cost of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The infrastructure needs inventory shall not duplicate the extensive needs data currently maintained by various state agencies on state facilities that are presently available to the commission. This limitation does not prohibit one (1) or more counties or municipalities from identifying a need for a vocational educational facility or a community college or a new public health building in a particular local area. In addition, the commission may request various state agencies to supply various needs data that may be available in such areas as highway or rail bridges, airports or other areas.

The annual public infrastructure needs inventory by each development district or an agency or entity of state or local government or higher education shall be conducted utilizing standard statewide procedures and summary format as determined by the commission to facilitate ease and accuracy in summarizing statewide needs and costs.

The public infrastructure needs inventory shall be completed by the development districts or an agency or entity of state or local government or higher education and submitted to the commission no later than June 30 of each year.

The annual inventory of statewide public infrastructure needs and costs for provision of adequate and essential public infrastructure shall be presented by the commission to the general assembly at its next regular annual session following completion of the inventory each year.

Acts 1996, ch. 817, § 1; 1997, ch. 529, §§ 8, 9; 2000, ch. 672, §§ 2-5; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Attorney General Opinions. The release of pole attachment rates received by the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations would not violate any state or federal law, OAG 06-129, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 146 (8/15/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 146.

4-10-110. Effect of tax abatements or reductions on local public education.

The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR) is directed to perform a study of the overall effect on local public education when property taxes or in lieu of tax payments earmarked for education are abated or reduced and whether the effect on local public education is offset by enhanced economic development. This study shall be conducted from TACIR's existing resources.

All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to TACIR.

TACIR shall report its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation or interim reports upon conclusion of its study.

Acts 2002, ch. 815, § 1.

4-10-111. Study on titling of boats.

The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR) is directed to perform a study of the creation and implementation of a system for the titling of boats in this state. This study must be conducted from TACIR's existing resources.

All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to TACIR in connection with the study required by subsection (a).

TACIR shall report its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation or interim reports upon conclusion of its study.

Acts 2017, ch. 179, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former section §4-10-111 (Acts 2009, ch. 473, § 3) ) concerning the study on the impact on public safety of non-emergency communications district affiliated public service answering points, the report for which was to be delivered by December 1, 2011, was deemed obsolete by the Code Commission in 2015.

4-10-112. Monitoring of current wholesale power supply arrangements between the TVA and municipal utilities and electric cooperatives.

The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR) is directed to continue to monitor, within existing resources, whether the current wholesale power supply arrangements between the Tennessee Valley authority and municipal utilities and electric cooperatives are likely to change in the future in a way that could affect payments in lieu of taxes from the Tennessee Valley authority to the state and to its local governments. No later than the last day of February of each year, TACIR shall report written findings to the commerce and labor committee of the senate, the commerce committee of the house of representatives, the finance, ways and means committee of the senate, and the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives. The report shall include recommendations, if any, on adjustments to the state tax system that would keep the state and local governments whole from such future changes.

Acts 2010, ch. 1035, § 4; 2013, ch. 236, § 13; 2016, ch. 797, § 15; 2019, ch. 345, § 9.

4-10-113. Report update on broadband service.

The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations is directed to study and prepare a report updating its January 2017 Report on Broadband Internet Deployment, Availability, and Adoption in Tennessee, which shall be delivered to the general assembly by January 15, 2021.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-10-114. Tax credits for shippers — Definitions — Study — Report.

As used in this section:

“Accessorial services”:

Means any service that is incidental to transportation services; and

Includes storage, packing, unpacking, hoisting or lowering, waiting time, overtime loading and unloading, and reweighing;

“Best interests of the state” means a determination by the commissioner, with approval by the commissioner of economic and community development, that the qualified transportation expenditures are a result of the credit described in this section;

“Freight motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is designed and used primarily to transport goods for hire or for commercial purposes;

“Goods” means personal property that is treated as movable for the purposes of a contract for transportation services;

“Line haul services” means the movement of goods over the public highways from the point of origination to the final destination;

“Motor carrier” means a person who operates or causes to be operated a freight motor vehicle on a public highway for the purpose of performing transportation services;

“Person” means every individual, firm, association, joint-stock company, syndicate, partnership, corporation, or other business entity;

“Qualified transportation expenditures” means the total charges incurred by a shipper for line haul services, transportation services, and accessorial services performed by a motor carrier for shipments picked up at points of origination within this state or delivered to final destinations within this state;

“Shipper” means any person that enters into a contract for transportation services with a motor carrier;

“Transportation services” means the pickup or delivery, or both, of goods at the point of origination or final destination; and

“Turn-around policy” means the uniform and internal policy established by a shipper that meets the requirements of subdivision (c)(2).

The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR) is directed to perform a study of the potential, overall effects of creating a franchise and excise tax credit for shippers with pickups or deliveries originating in, or destined to, any county having a population over nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

In conducting the study under subsection (b), TACIR shall consider a franchise and excise tax credit that meets the following criteria:

The credit would be allowed to any shipper that establishes and implements a turn-around policy pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) against the sum total of the franchise and excise taxes owed by the shipper, equal to two percent (2%) of qualified transportation expenditures;

To qualify for the credit described in this section, the shipper would establish and implement a uniform and internal turn-around policy for assuring that pickups and deliveries are performed during the period of time agreed upon by a motor carrier and a shipper and for preventing delays in the timely transportation of goods over the public highways. The policy must include the following minimum requirements:

That pickups and deliveries shall be accomplished on the date scheduled for pickup or delivery, that pickups must be completed within the period of time agreed to by the shipper and the motor carrier, which period shall not exceed two (2) hours, and that deliveries must be completed within the period of time agreed to by the shipper and the motor carrier, which period shall not exceed two (2) hours; and

That for each shipment of goods for which transportation services of the motor carrier is requested by a shipper, the shipper shall provide the motor carrier with contact information for:

Any person who may authorize pickup or delivery of any goods to be transported if the shipper designates such a person;

The shipper and any person receiving the pickup or delivery, if different from the shipper; and

Any person to whom notification of delays or that goods are available for pickup or delivery, shall be given;

The credit would only be available upon a determination by the commissioner of revenue, with approval by the commissioner of economic and community development, that the qualified transportation expenditures and the credit are in the best interests of the state;

The credit would apply only in the tax year in which the shipper implements a turn-around policy meeting the criteria in subdivision (c)(2), incurs qualified transportation expenditures, and otherwise meets the requirements of this section; and

The total credit claimed for any taxable year, including the amount of any carryforward credit claimed, would not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the combined franchise and excise tax liability shown by the return before any credit is taken. Any unused credit could be carried forward in any tax period until the credit is taken; provided, however, that the credit could not be carried forward for more than fifteen (15) years.

All appropriate state agencies and departments shall provide assistance to TACIR upon the request of its executive director.

TACIR shall submit a report disclosing the findings of the study and recommendations, including any proposed legislation or interim reports, to the general assembly no later than February 1, 2020.

Acts 2018, ch. 952, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.